District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0103.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Fairness in Use and Negotiation for All Recreational Property Act of
2025”.


Sec. 2. Submission to the Council of long-term use or license agreements.
(a) For purposes of this section, the term:
(1) “District-owned recreational property” means any park, playground, recreation
center, community center, sports field, aquatic center, District of Columbia public school
buildings, or similar recreational space titled in the name of the District or in which the District
has a controlling interest. The term “District-owned recreational property” does not include
facilities operated by a District of Columbia Public Charter School.
(2) “Exclusive agreement” means a use agreement, license agreement, or other
contractual arrangement between the District government, and another party that has a duration
of 3 years or greater, inclusive of options, and that provides the other party with a right, whether
fully exercised or not, to exclude others from using the District-owned recreational property
during the District-owned recreational property’s typical operating hours. The term “exclusive
agreement” does not include any real property disposition or contract that is subject to Council
approval under another District law.
(b)(1) Before entering into an exclusive agreement with respect to the use of District-
owned recreational property, the Mayor shall satisfy the public engagement requirements of
subsection (c) of this section and submit a proposed resolution to the Council for review and
approval in accordance with the criteria established in paragraph (2) of this subsection.
(2) A proposed exclusive agreement shall be deemed approved by the Council if
one of the following occurs:
(A) During the 10-day period beginning on the 1st day (excluding
Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays) following its receipt by the Office of the Secretary to the


Council, no member of the Council introduces a resolution to approve or disapprove the
proposed exclusive agreement; or
(B) If a resolution has been introduced in accordance with subparagraph
(A) of this paragraph, and the Council does not approve or disapprove the exclusive agreement
during the 45-day review period beginning on the 1st day (excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and
holidays) following its receipt by the Office of the Secretary to the Council.
(c)(1) Before submitting a proposed resolution pursuant to this section, the Mayor shall
hold at least one public hearing to obtain community input to inform the Mayor’s determination
whether an exclusive agreement should be entered into with respect to the District-owned
recreational property.
(2)(A) The hearing shall be held at an accessible evening or weekend time and in
an accessible location in the vicinity of the District-owned recreational property.
(B) The Mayor shall:
(i) At least 30 days before holding the public hearing, provide
written notice of the public hearing to affected Advisory Neighborhood Commissions, which
shall contain a summary of the proposal and the information described in subsection (d) of this
section; and
(ii) At least 15 days before the hearing, publicize the public
hearing by posting a written notice at the District-owned recreational property and placing a
notice of the public hearing in the District of Columbia Register.
(d) A proposed resolution submitted pursuant to subsection (b) of this section shall:
(1) Include the following:


(A) A physical description of the District-owned recreational property;
(B) The name and business address, if applicable, of the intended
counterparty to the proposed exclusive agreement;
(C) A description of the use of the District-owned recreational property to
be permitted under the exclusive agreement;
(D) A statement that the exclusive agreement shall not be inconsistent
with the substantive business terms submitted by the Mayor with the resolution in accordance
with paragraph (2) of this subsection, unless revisions to those substantive business terms are
approved by the Council; and
(E) A statement that the exclusive agreement shall contain a provision
requiring an annual audit to ensure the lease abides by the usage agreement.
(2) Be accompanied by an analysis that includes the following:
(A) An executed term sheet or memorandum of understanding between the
District and the intended counterparty to the proposed exclusive agreement, including a
description of the substantive business terms of the exclusive agreement and any other terms that
the Mayor finds to be in the best interest of the District;
(B) A description of the District’s current use of the District-owned
recreational property, the fair market value of the requested use, the anticipated amount that
would be charged for exclusive usage, and why the District’s use of the property should be
limited or should cease pursuant to the proposed exclusive agreement;
(C) A description of potential public uses of the District-owned
recreational property considered by the Mayor;


(D) A detailed narrative as to why the District-owned recreational property
is better suited for the purpose described in the proposed exclusive agreement rather than for
each public use considered by the Mayor;
(E) A detailed explanation why the proposed exclusive agreement is in the
best interests of the District;
(F) An explanation of any impact that the proposed exclusive agreement is
expected to have on racial equity in the District; and
(G) A summary of public comments received at the public hearing
required under subsection (c) of this section.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(l) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
100 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § l-206.02(c)(l)), and publication in the District of
101 Columbia Register.